www/common/latex/texlive/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex/hyph-ru.tex
% This file is part of hyph-utf8 package and resulted from
% semi-manual conversions of hyphenation patterns into UTF-8 in June 2008.
%
% Source: TODO:WRITEME (2003-03-10)
% Author: Alexander I. Lebedev <swan at scon155.phys.msu.su>
%
% The above mentioned file should become obsolete,
% and the author of the original file should preferably modify this file instead.
%
% Modifications were needed in order to support native UTF-8 engines,
% but functionality (hopefully) didn't change in any way, at least not intentionally.
% This file is no longer stand-alone; at least for 8-bit engines
% you probably want to use loadhyph-foo.tex (which will load this file) instead.
%
% Modifications were done by Jonathan Kew, Mojca Miklavec & Arthur Reutenauer
% with help & support from:
% - Karl Berry, who gave us free hands and all resources
% - Taco Hoekwater, with useful macros
% - Hans Hagen, who did the unicodification of patterns already long before
%               and helped with testing, suggestions and bug reports
% - Norbert Preining, who tested & integrated patterns into TeX Live
%
% However, the "copyright/copyleft" owner of patterns remains the original author.
%
% The copyright statement of this file is thus:
%
%    Do with this file whatever needs to be done in future for the sake of
%    "a better world" as long as you respect the copyright of original file.
%    If you're the original author of patterns or taking over a new revolution,
%    plese remove all of the TUG comments & credits that we added here -
%    you are the Queen / the King, we are only the servants.
%
% If you want to change this file, rather than uploading directly to CTAN,
% we would be grateful if you could send it to us (http://tug.org/tex-hyphen)
% or ask for credentials for SVN repository and commit it yourself;
% we will then upload the whole "package" to CTAN.
%
% Before a new "pattern-revolution" starts,
% please try to follow some guidelines if possible:
%
% - \lccode is *forbidden*, and I really mean it
% - all the patterns should be in UTF-8
% - the only "allowed" TeX commands in this file are: \patterns, \hyphenation,
%   and if you really cannot do without, also \input and \message
% - in particular, please no \catcode or \lccode changes,
%   they belong to loadhyph-foo.tex,
%   and no \lefthyphenmin and \righthyphenmin,
%   they have no influence here and belong elsewhere
% - \begingroup and/or \endinput is not needed
% - feel free to do whatever you want inside comments
%
% We know that TeX is extremely powerful, but give a stupid parser
% at least a chance to read your patterns.
%
% For more unformation see
%
%    http://tug.org/tex-hyphen
%
%------------------------------------------------------------------------------
%
% Russian hyphenation patterns, version 2003/03/10
% Copyright 1999-2003 Alexander I. Lebedev <swan@scon155.phys.msu.su>
%
% This program may be distributed and/or modified under the conditions
% of the LaTeX Project Public License, either version 1.2 or any later
% version.
%
% Patterns were generated with patgen from a 990,000-word list and then
% manually corrected.
%
% The program consists of the files ruhyphal.tex, cyryoal.tex and two
% document files README.ruhyphal and hyphen.rules.  The file cyryoal.tex
% can be regenerated using mkcyryo script (a part of ruhyphen package)
% and the latest release of rus-ispell dictionaries
% <ftp://scon155.phys.msu.su/pub/russian/ispell/>.
\patterns{
.аб1р
.аг1ро
.ади2
.аи2
.ак1р
.аль3я
.ар2т1о2
.ас1то
.аст1р
.ау2
.би2о
.во2б3л
.во3ж2д
.го2ф
.дек2
.де1кв
.ди2ак
.ди1о
.до3п
.до3т2
.епи3
.зав2р
.за3м2н
.за3п
.иг1р
.изг2
.из3н
.ии2
.ик1р
.ио2
.ио4на
.ис3
.ле2о
.ле2п3р
.лес1к
.ль2
.люст1
.ме2ж1у2
.ми1ом
.мо2к1
.му2шт1
.на1в
.на3т
.на3ш2
.не3вн
.не1др
.не1з2
.не1сл
.не1с2ц
.не3т
.нос1к
.нук1л
.обо3ж2
.ово1
.ог3н
.оз4
.ос2ка
.ос2п
.ос3пи
.от1в
.от1ро
.от1ру
.от1уж
.по3в2
.по3ж2
.поз2н
.прос2
.ра2с3т
.ре2бр
.ре2з3в
.ри2ск
.ри2ч
.ро2з3в
.ро2с3л
.ро2х
.септ2
.ск2
.ст2
.су2ж
.те2о3
.тиа3
.ти2г
.тиг1р
.ти2о
.уб2
.уд2
.уе2
.уз2на
.ук2
.ум2ч
.уо3
.уп2
.ур2в
.ус2
.ут2р
.ую2
.хо2р3в
.че2с1к
.юс1
4а3а
аа2п
аа2р
аа2ц
а1б
абе3ст
а3бла
аб2лю
аб1ри
а3бу
ав1в
а1ве
ав3зо
а1ви
ави2а
а1во
аво1с
а2вот
ав1ра
ав2се
а2вт
а1ву
а2вх
а3в2че
2ага
ага1с2
а2гд
а2гити
а2гле
аг2ли
а2глос
аг2лот
2аго
а3гу
а1д
2адв
а2две
ад2жи
ади2од
а2дл
а2д1обл
ад1ро
а2д1ру
аду3ч
ад2ц
а2дын
а1е
ае2го
ае2ди
ае2л
а2еп
ае2ре
ае2с
аза4ш3
азв2
аз3вез
аз1вл
азг2
аз1др
аз1об
аз2о1бр
а2зовь
а2золь
а1зори
аз2о1с
аз1р
а1и
аи2г1
аи3гл
а2их
а1к
ак1в
1акк
ак2л
ак3лем
ако1б2
2аконс
ако3т
2акри
ак1с
а1ла
а3лаг
а1ле
2алек
а3ли
ало1з
а1лу
алу2ш
алуш1т
а1лы
а2льщ
а1лю
2ама
амб4
2амет
а2минт
ам2нет
2амо
амо1з2
амои2
а2мч
ана2дц
а2н1а2ме
а2наф
ан2дра
а2н1о2б
ан1о2хр
ан1р
ан2сп
анс1у
ан2сур
а2н1уз
а1нь
2а1о
ао2д
ао2к
ао2р
ао2с
аост1
а3пла
ап2лом
2апо
апо4вс
апо3ч2т
ап2ра
ап1рел
а1ра
ара2ст
ар2бок
ар2вал
1аргу
а1ре
аре1дв
аре1ол
ар2жа
а1ри
а1ро
ар2тор
ар2т1р
а1ру
ар1х
а1ры
а1рю
а1ря
2ас1к
ас3ми
ас3но
1ассиг
аст1ву
ас3тем
ас2тин
ас2тия
ас1тоо
ас1тух
а1стье
ас2шед
ас2шес
а1сьи
а1та
1атак
ат3ва
ат1ви
ат1ву
2атез
а1ти
а1то
ат1обе
а2томн
ато2ш
ат1рах
ат1ри
а1ту
ат2х
а1ты
а1тье
а3тью
а3тья
а1тю
а1тя
а1у
а2уб
ау2д
ау3до
а2уле
аут1р
ау2х
ау2ч
ау3чь
ауэ1
а2ф1л
ах2а
ахми2
ах3с
а1ч
2ача
а2чл
ач1т
а2шл
аэ2ли
а2эр
аю1та
а1я
ая2б
ая2в
ая2з
1ба
ба2бв
ба2г1р
ба2др
ба1з
ба3зу
балю1
ба2о
бас3м
ба1ст
ба1тр
2б1б
б1в
бвы2
бг2
2б1д
1бе
3бев
бе2гл
бе2гн
бе2д1р
3бее
3бе2з
без1а2
без5д4
бе3зи
без3н
без1о2
без1р
бе2с1к
бес3п
бе2с1т
бес3те
бес3ти
3бец
2бещ
2бж
б1з2
1б2и
3биа
би2б
2биж
3бик
били3т2
3био
би2об
би2од
би2он
би2ор
би2тв
би1х
2б3к
б1л
1благ
1б2лаз
б3лази
б2лан
1б2лее
б3лен
б2лес1к
1б2лея
б2луд
1б2луж
2блы
2б2ль
2б3лю.
б2люд
б2люе
б2люл
2б3люсь
2бля
2б3н
1бо
бо1бра
бо3вш
бо2гд
бо1дра
бо1з2
бо1л2ж
бо1льс
бо3м2л
бо2мч
бо3мш
бону1
бо1ру
бо2са
бо1ск
бо3ско
бо3сти
3бот
бо2тв
бот2р
боя2р
2бр.
б3раб
б2рав
бра1зо
1б2рал
2б1рам
б2ран
1брас
б2рать
б1рах
1б2рач
2б3рая
1б2ред
б1рей
б1рек
б2рем
б2рех
б2рид
б2рито
б2риты
1б2роди
б1рол
б1ром.
1б2роси
бро2с1к
2брс
б1ру
3брукс
2брь
1б2рю
2б3рю.
б1ря
2б1с2
б3ск
бс4л
б1т
1б2у
бу2г1р
бук1л
бу1с
2бф
2б1х
2бц
2б1ч
2бш
2бщ
1бы
бы2г1
бы2с
быс1к
быст1
1бь
2бь.
2бьс
2бьт
бэ1р
3б2ю
бю1та
1бя
1ва
ва2бр
3ваг
ва2д1р
вадь2
ва3ж2д
ва1з
ванс2
ва1ст
ва2стр
ва1тр
вах1
3вац
3вая
2в1б
в1ви
в1вр
2вг2
в1д
в2дох
1вев
3вег
вед1р
ве3ду
1вее
1вез
3везе
3везл
вез2у
1вей.
ве2п1
2верд
1вес
ве2с1к
ве2ст1в
вет3р
1вец
1вею
1вея
1в2з2
взг2
взд2
взо1б
взъ2
взъе3д
ви2аз
ви2ак
ви2ар
ви2а1с2
виа1т
ви3аф
ви2гв
ви2гл
1виз
1винт
1винч
ви1о
ви1с2ни
виу3
ви2ф
2в1к
вк2л
3в2кус
в1л
в2ла
2в3лаб
в2лев
в2лек
в2лет
в2леч
2вли
в2лия
2влю
в2люб
2вля
2вм
1вме
2в1н
4в3на
в2нес
вно1
в3ну.
3в2нук
3в2нуч
в3ны
во1б2
во2б3ла
вов2
во3вк
1вод
во1дв
во1др
во2ер
во2жж
вои2с1
1вок
во3м2
воп2
во1ру
2ворц
2ворь
вос1к
во1см
во1сн
вос3пе
во2стр
вот2р
1вох
во1хл
во3х2т
1вою
2вп2
2вр.
2вра.
в2рав
2в1рам
в1рас
2в1рах
2врац
2вре.
2в1рен
1врид
1в2риз
в1рии
в1рик
в1рил
в1рис
в1рит
2в1ро
вро3т2
2в1ры
1врю
в1ря
2в1с2
3все3
в3ская
4в3ски
4в3ску
3в2сп
3в2сю
в1т2
вто1б2
вто3ш
1вуа
ву3г
1ву1з
2вуи
2ву1к
ву3п
ву1с2
ву2х1а
вух3в
ву1чл
вф2
1вхо
2вц
2в1ч
2вш
3в2шив
2вщ
въ2
1вы
вы3г2
вы3зн
вып2
вы3т2
вых2
вы3ш2л
2вь.
1вье
1вьин
2вьс
2вьт
1вью
1вья
1в2э1
1в2ю
1вя
1г
г2а
га1з
га1ст2
га2у
2г3б
гба2
г1ви
2гг
г3дан
2г3ди
3ге.
ге2б1
гено1
ге2об
ге2од
ге1ор
2г3ж
2г1з
г2и
ги2бл
ги3бр
ги2гр
ги1сл
гист2
2г1к
2гла.
г2лав
г1лай
г1лами
2глась
2глая
г1ле
г2лет
2гли.
г2лин
3г2лиф
2гло.
г3лобл
2глов
2глог
2глое
2глой
2глою
2глую
2г1лы
г2ляж
2гляк
2г3м
г2нав
г2нан
г3не.
г2нев
г3нен
г3неп
г3нес
г2нир
гнит2р
г2ное
г2нои
г2нос
г3ня
го1б2
го2вл
го3ж2д
го1з
го2зл
гоз2н
гоиг2
3гой
г2ол
гоми2
го2с1а
го2сд
го1скл
го1сн
го1спа
2готд
гоу3т
го1чл
3гою
2гп
2гр.
г1рае
г1рай
г1рар
г1рег
г1рек
г1рец
гри4в3н
г1рик
г1рил
г1рин
г1рис
г1рич
г1ров
г2роз
г1рок
г1рон
г1роп
г1рот
г1роф
гру2п
г1рыв
2грю
г1ряе
г1рял
г1рят
2г3с2
г4са
г4сб
2г3т
гу1в
гу1с
гу2с1к
2гф
2г1ч
2г3ш
2г3э
1да
да2б1
да2ген
да2гр
да1з
да2о
даст1р
дат1р
2д1б
дв2
д1ве
1дви
2д1вид
2двиз
2двинт
2двинч
2д1вис
2д1вит
д3вк
д1вл
2двод
д1воз
1дворь
2двя
2дг2
2д1д2
1де
де1б2л
де1б2р
3девр
3дез
де2з1а2
де2зи
дез1о2
де2зу
деио2
де1кл
3деме
де2од
део3п
де3пл
дерас2
де2с3в
дес2к
де2ср
де1хл
2дж.
д2жам
д2ж3м
2джс
2д1з2
1ди
ди2ад
диа2з
ди2али
ди2ало
ди2ар
ди2ас
ди2об
дио3де
ди2ор
дио1с
ди1оти
дип2
ди2пи
ди3пт
ди2с1тр
диу3
ди3фр
ди3фто
ди1х
2д1к
д1л
д2лев
2д3м2
2д1н
д3на
днеа2
3дневн
4д3но1
дно3д2
днос2
4д3ны
3д2няш
1до
2д1о2бед
до2бл
2д1обла
до1б2ра
дов2л
до3в2м
до1д2
до3дн
до3ж2д
до1з
доз2н
дои2р
2докт
2долим
до2м1р
доп2
до3пл
2допле
до2пре
до2руб
до1с
д1о2сен
д1о2син
2д1осно
дос2п
2дотд
2дотл
дот2ри
2д1отря
2дотъ
до3ть
3дохл
до2ш3в
до3ш2к
до2шлы
до2щу
2дп
2др.
д1раб
1дравш
2дразв
1д2разн
д1ране
д1рар
д1ра2с3
д1рах
д1рач
д2раю
д1ре
д2реб
2д3реж
2дрез
д2рел
д2рем
1дрема
1дремл
дрем3н
1дремы
2д3рен
дре2ск
д2ресс
д1ри
д2рий
2дрин
д2рип
д2рих
дро2г3н
д1род
д1рое
1д2рож
2д3роз
д1рой
д1рол
д1рон
д1рос
д1рот
д1рою
д1руб
1друг
1друж
д1рум
д1рую
д1ры
2дрыв
1д2рыг
д1ря
д2ряб
1д2ряг
д2рях
2д1с2
дск2
дс3кн
2д1т
1ду
дуб3р
ду3г
2д1уд
ду2да
ду2о
дуп1л
дус1к
д1усл
ду1ст
ду2ста
2дут1р
ду1х
ду2чи
дуэ1т
2дф
д1х
2д3це
2дцу
2дцы
2д1ч
2д3ш2
2дщ
2дъ
дъе2м
1ды
2дыг
ды2г1р
2дыд
2дыме
2ды2с1
2дыт
2дыщ
2дь.
1дье
2дьк
2дьт
1дью
1дья
дь3яр
1д2ю
1дя
е1а
еа2д
еади3
еа3до
еа2з
еан2д1р
еат1р
2еб
еба2с
е1бра
еб1рен
еб1ри
е1бро
еб1ров
еб1ры
е2б3рю
е1ве
2евер
е1ви
е3в2ме
ев2ним
ев2нят
е1во
2евол
евра1с
2е1вре
ев1рее
ев1рей
ев1рея
ев1ри
е2вт
е1ву
е1вх
ев2хо
е1вь
ега1с2
ег2д
е2глан
е2гле
е2гли
е2гло
ег2на
ег2но
2ег2р
ед1во
ед2ж
е1дже
е1д2лин
едноу3
ед1опр
е2дотв
е2дох
е2д1ощ
е1дру
е2дру.
е2ду2б
ед1убо
е2дуве
е2дуг
е2дус
ед1уст
2е3душ
е2дын
е1е
е2евид
ее2в1р
ее2ги
ее1с2
ее2ст
еест1р
ее2х
е2жг
е4ждев
еж3ди
2еже
е2ж1р
еза2вр
езау3
е1з2ва
езд1р
е3зе
еззу3
е3зит
ез1об
ез1о2г
е1зом
ез1оп
ез1о2р
ез1от
ез1ош
ез2ря
ез1у2д
ез1у2к
ез1уп
ез1ус
езу2со
езу2сы
ез1у2х
ез1уча
е3зя
е1и
еи2г1
еи2д
еи2м
еи2о
еис1л
еис1тр
е1ка
ека2б
ек2з
е1ки
2е1ко
2е1кр
ек2ро
ек1ск
ек1сте
е1ку
е1ла
е1ле
еле3ск
еле1сц
е1лу
е1лы
е1лю
е3ля
еми3д2
еми3к
емо1с
2емуж
е2мч
2емыс
е3на
ен2д1р
2е1нр
енс2
ен3ш2
е1нэ
2ео
е1о2б
еоб2ро
е2о3гл
ео2гро
е1од
ео3да
ео2де
еоде3з
ео2до
е1о2ж
е2ои
ео3кл
е1ол.
е1ола
ео3ли
е1олк
е1олы
е1оль
е2ом
е1он.
е2она
е2они
ео3но
е1онс
еоп2
е1опе
ео2пр
ео4пу
е2о3ро
еос2
е1о2сви
ео1ск
е1осм
е1осн
еост1р
ео3сх
е1отл
еот2ру
е1о2ч
е1о2щ
епат2
епа1тр
2епе
епис2к
е2пл
е3пла
еп1леш
е3п2лод
еп1лу
е3плы
еп1лющ
е4пн
2епо
е4п3с
е4пт
е1ра
ер1акт
е2рв
ер1ве
е1ре
е3ре.
ере3до
ере1др
ере1к2
ере3м2н
ере3п
ере1х4
е1ри
ерио3з
е1ро
еро2б
ер1обл
2ерови
2ерокр
2ерол
еро3ф2
ер3ск
е1ру
е2р1у2п
е1ры
е1рю
е1ря
е3с2а
ес2ба
е1сг
е1ск
е2с1ка.
ес1кал
е2ске
е2сков
е4с1ку.
2есл
ес1лас
ес2лин
ес2лов
ес2лом
е1слу
е1слы
е1с4м
е3со
2есп
ес2пек
ес3пол
е2спу
е1ст
ес2тан
е2стл
е3сту
ес2чет
е1та
ет1ве
ет1ви
е1тво
2етеч
е1ти
е1то
ето1с
ет1р
ет2ря
е1ту
е1ты
е1тье
е3тью
е3тья
е1тю
е1тя
е1у2
2еуб
еуб3р
еуз2
еук2ло
ефи3б2
еф2л
еф1ре
еха2т
ех1ато
ех3вал
ех3лоп
ех1об
ех1опо
ех1ре
ех1ру
ех1у2ч
2ецв
е1чл
е2шл
еэ2
ею2г
е1я
ея2з
1ж
жа2бл
жа2бр
жа1з
жат1в
2ж1б2
2ж1в
жг2
2жга
ж2ги
3ж2гл
ж2гу
2ж1д
ж2дак
ж2дач
3ж2дел
4ждеме
ж2деп
ж2ди
4ж2дл
ждо3
жду1
4ждь
3ж2дя
3жев
же3д2
же1к2в
же1кл
же1о2
же3п2
же1с2
же3ск
2жжа
ж2же
2жжев
2ж1з2
жи1о
2жирр
2ж1к
2ж1л
ж2м
ж3ма
2ж3мо
2ж1н
жно1
2ж1об
2ж1о2т1
жоу3
жоу1с
2жп2
жпо1
ж2ру
2ж1с
2жф
2жц
2ж1ч
2жъ
2жь.
2жьс
2жьт
1за1
заа2
заб2
за2в1ри
за2вру
з1аву
заг4
з1адр
зае2д
зае2х
за3ж2д
за3з2
з1акт
за3мне
3з2ан
за3на
занс2
зап2
зар2в
за3р2д
зар2ж
зас2
заст2
зат2
за3тк
зау2
зах2
зач2т
за3ш2
зая2
з1б2
2з3ва.
з2вав
з3валь
з2ван
2звая
з1ве
з2вез
з1ви
з3в2к
з1вла
з1во
2звол
1з2вон
з1вр
1зву
2з1вую
з1вь
2зг
з3га
з2гли
зг2на
з2гну
з1д2в
з2деш
здож3
1зе
зе2б1
зе2ев
зе2од
2зж2
з3з2
1зи
3зи.
3зий.
з1инт
зи2оз
зи2оно
зи1оп
3зис
зи3т2р
зиу3м
3зич
2з1к
зко1
зко3п2
з1л
з2лащ
з2лоб
з2лоп
з2лор
з2лющ
2зм2
з3мн
з1н
2зна.
з2нав
з2нае
з2най
з2нак
з2нан
з2нат
з2наю
2зная
2зне
2з3ни
2зно
2зну
2з3ны
з2обе
зо2би
1зов
зо3в2м
зо2гл
зо1др
1зое
зо1з2
1зои
1зой.
1зок.
з1окс
1зол2
зо1лг
зо1лж
зо3м2
1зом.
2зомн
1зон
2зонр
1зоо
зо2о3п
зо2ос
зо2па
з2опл
з2опр
